North Carolina statutes. Chapter 148. State Prison System.
Article 7. Records, Statistics, Research and Planning.

§ 148-74.
Records Section. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Case records and related materials compiled for the use of the Secretary of Public Safety and the Parole Commission shall be maintained in a single central file system designed to minimize duplication and maximize effective use of such records and materials. When an individual is committed to the State prison system after a period on probation, the probation files on that individual shall be made a part of the combined files used by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and the Parole Commission. The administration of the Records Section shall be under the control and direction of the Secretary of Public Safety.

History.

1925, c. 228, s. 1; 1953, c. 55, ss. 2, 4; 1967, c. 996, s. 12; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1985, c. 226, s. 12; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(qqqqqqqq).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(qqqqqqqq), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the last sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” twice and substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the second sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-74.
Records Section. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Case records and related materials compiled for the use of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction and the Parole Commission shall be maintained in a single central file system designed to minimize duplication and maximize effective use of such records and materials. When an individual is committed to the State prison system after a period on probation, the probation files on that individual shall be made a part of the combined files used by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and the Parole Commission. The administration of the Records Section shall be under the control and direction of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction.

History.

1925, c. 228, s. 1; 1953, c. 55, ss. 2, 4; 1967, c. 996, s. 12; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1985, c. 226, s. 12; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(qqqqqqqq); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(qqqqqqqq), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the last sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” twice and substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the second sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-75.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1963, c. 1174, s. 5.

§ 148-76.
Duties of Records Section.

The Records Section shall maintain the combined case records and receive and collect fingerprints, photographs, and other information to assist in locating, identifying, and keeping records of criminals. The information collected shall be classified, compared, and made available to law-enforcement agencies, courts, correctional agencies, or other officials requiring criminal identification, crime statistics, and other information respecting crimes and criminals.

History.

1925, c. 228, s. 3; 1953, c. 55, s. 4; 1967, c. 996, s. 12.

§ 148-77.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-168, s. 5(a), effective July 12, 2012.

History.

1925, c. 228, s. 4; 1967, c. 996, s. 12; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); repealed by 2012-168, s. 5(a), effective July 12, 2012.

Cross References.

For present similar provisions, see G.S. 143B-600(a), which establishes, within the Division of Administration of the Department of Public Safety, a Research and Planning Section responsible for statistics, research, and planning to facilitate regular improvement in the structure, administration, and programs of the Department of Public Safety.

§ 148-78.
Reports. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Secretary of Public Safety may prepare and release reports on the work of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, including statistics and other data, accounts of research, and recommendations for legislation.

History.

1925, c. 228, s. 5; 1953, c. 55, s. 4; 1967, c. 996, s. 12; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(rrrrrrrr).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(rrrrrrrrr), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” near the beginning and substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” near the middle of this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-78.
Reports. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction may prepare and release reports on the work of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction, including statistics and other data, accounts of research, and recommendations for legislation.

History.

1925, c. 228, s. 5; 1953, c. 55, s. 4; 1967, c. 996, s. 12; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(rrrrrrrr); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(rrrrrrrrr), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” near the beginning and substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” near the middle of this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-79.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1965, c. 1049, s. 2.

Cross References.

For present provisions relating to the duty of the State Bureau of Investigation to provide criminal information, see

G.S. 143B-906

.

§ 148-80.
Seal of Records Section; certification of records.

A seal shall be provided to be affixed to any paper, record, copy or form or true copy of any of the same in the files or records of the Records Section, and when so certified under seal by the duly appointed custodian, such record or copy shall be admitted as evidence in any court of the State.

History.

1925, c. 228, s. 7; 1953, c. 55, s. 4; 1967, c. 996, s. 12.

§ 148-81.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1965, c. 1049, s. 2.